Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB479.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 194A.545 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services[secretary for health and family
services] shall develop an initial training course and continuing education courses
for employees of the Department for Community Based Services concerning the
dynamics of domestic violence and elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation; effects of
domestic violence and elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation on adult and child
victims; legal remedies for protection; lethality and risk issues; model protocols for
addressing domestic violence; available community resources and victim services;
and reporting requirements. The training shall be developed in consultation with
legal, victim services, victim advocacy, and mental health professionals with an
expertise in domestic violence.
(2) The Department for Community Based Services shall:
(a) Require the employees described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section to
complete a one (1) hour dementia training and continuing education course
that shall include but not be limited to the following subjects:
1. Basic aspects of Alzheimer's disease and other types of dementia,
including but not limited to the warning signs, risk factors, and stages
of the disease;
2. Identification of adults with dementia;
3. Communication and dementia-related behavior;
4. Safety risks for adults with dementia such as wandering,
communication impairments, and elder abuse; and
5. Best practices for interacting with adults with dementia; and
(b) Use available training from a nationally recognized entity that has a specific
focus on Alzheimer's disease and other types of dementia and is available at
Page 1 of 2
BR165500.100 - 1655 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:04 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1655
no cost to the cabinet or its employees.
(3) Each person employed by the Department for Community Based Services who
provides supervisory or direct service at the local, district, or state level shall
successfully complete the initial training course and, at least once every two (2)
years, the continuing education courses [course ]developed or provided under
subsections [subsection ](1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Each person who is employed by the Department for Community Based Services
or is contracted with the Department for Community Based Services to provide
adult protective services or to work on the development or implementation of
social services to respond to and prevent elder abuse, neglect, or exploitation shall
complete the training and continuing education as required under subsection (2)
of this section:
(a) Within six (6) months of the effective date of this Act; or
(b) Upon initial employment.
(5)[(3)] The cabinet[secretary] is encouraged to include an educational component
covering the recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as
defined in KRS 620.020, as part of the initial training and continuing education for
Department for Community Based Services front-line child protection staff.
Page 2 of 2
BR165500.100 - 1655 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:04 PM Jacketed